Missouri, session 2026, HB2390.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 167.720, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 167.720, to read as follows:
167.720. 1. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Moderate physical activity", low- to medium-impact physical exertion designed
to increase an individual's heart rate to rise to at least seventy-five percent of his or her
maximum heart rate. Activities in this category may include, but are not limited to, running,
calisthenics, aerobic exercise, etc.;
(2) "Physical education", instruction in healthy active living by a teacher certificated
to teach physical education structured in such a way that it is a regularly scheduled class for
students;
(3) "Recess", a structured play environment outside of regular classroom instructional
activities, where students are allowed to engage in supervised safe active free play.
2. Beginning with the school year 2010-11:
(1) School districts shall ensure that students in elementary schools participate in
moderate physical activity for the entire school year, including students in alternative
education programs. Students in the elementary schools shall participate in moderate
physical activity for an average of one hundred fifty minutes per five-day school week, or an
average of thirty minutes per day. Students with disabilities shall participate in moderate
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2390 2
physical activity to the extent appropriate as determined by the provisions of the Individuals
with Disabilities Education Act, or Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act;
(2) Each year the commissioner of education shall select for recognition students,
schools and school districts that are considered to have achieved improvement in fitness;
(3) Students in middle schools may at the school's discretion participate in at least
two hundred twenty-five minutes of physical activity per school week;
(4) A minimum of one recess period of twenty minutes per day shall be provided for
children in elementary schools, which may be incorporated into the lunch period.
3. Any requirement of this section above the state minimum physical education
requirement may be met by additional physical education instruction, or by other activities
approved by the individual school district under the direction of any certificated teacher or
administrator or other school employee under the supervision of a certificated teacher or
administrator.
4. (1) This subsection shall be known and may be cited as "Quinton's Law".
(2) For the 2027–28 school year and all subsequent years, in addition to all other
requirements of this section, every public school district and charter school serving
students in kindergarten to grade eight shall provide students with:
(a) A minimum of fifteen minutes of recess, free time, or unstructured physical
activity for each full instructional day; and
(b) At least two daily brain breaks, defined as short periods of rest, stretching,
mindfulness, or noninstructional reset time lasting no fewer than three minutes each.
(3) Recess and brain breaks required under this subsection:
(a) Shall not be withheld as a disciplinary measure unless the behavior presents
a safety risk;
(b) Shall be held in environments that are safe, supervised, and developmentally
appropriate; and
(c) May be scheduled flexibly by the school to best meet student needs and
instructional schedules.
(4) (a) The department of elementary and secondary education may promulgate
all necessary rules and regulations for the implementation, monitoring, and
enforcement of this subsection. Such rules may include, but are not limited to:
a. Guidance on allowable activities for recess and brain breaks;
b. Professional development resources for teachers;
c. Data reporting requirements to ensure compliance; and
d. Procedures for waivers under exceptional circumstances.
(b) Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that
is created under the authority delegated in this subsection shall become effective only if

HB 2390 3
it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This subsection and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the
powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the
effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after the
effective date of this subsection shall be invalid and void.
(5) Subject to appropriation, the department may provide grants or technical
assistance to public schools to support the implementation of recess and brain break
programs including, but not limited to, training, equipment, and curriculum resources.
✔